el: Τύπος ελέγχου διακόπτη: Κουμπί; Μοχλός; Περιστροφικός; Γραμμή κύλισης; Αισθητήρας; Slider; Κλίση; Επαφή; Άλλο
en: Switch control type: Button; Lever; Rotary; Scrollbar; Sensor; Slider; Tilt; Touch; Other
de: Steuerungsart des Schalters: Schaltfläche; Hebel; Rotierend; Scrollleiste; Sensor; Schieberegler; Neigung; Touch; Sonstiges
hu: Kapcsoló vezérléstípusa: Gomb; Kar; Forgó; Görgetősáv; Érzékelő; Csúszka; Billenőkapcsoló; Érintés; Egyéb
zh-CN: 开关控制类型: 按键; 摇杆; 旋转型; 滚动条; 传感器; 滑块; 倾斜; 触碰; 其他
tr: Anahtar kontrol türü: Düğme; Kaldıraç; Döner; Kaydırma çubuğu; Sensör; Kaydırıcı; Eğim; Dokunma; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de controle de interruptor: Botão; Alavanca; Rotativo; Barra de rolagem; Sensor; Controle deslizante; Inclinação; Toque; Outro
sk-SK: Typ ovládania spínača: Tlačidlo; Páka; Rotačný; Posuvník; Senzor; Posuvník; Nakloniť; Dotykový; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de controlo de interruptor: Botão; Alavanca; Rotativo; Barra de deslocamento; Sensor; Deslizante; Inclinação; Tátil; Outro
fr: Type de contrôle de commutation: Bouton; Levier; Rotatif; Barre de défilement; Capteur; Curseur; Inclinaison; Intéractif; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta upravljanja prekidačem: Gumb; Poluga; Rotacijska; Traka za pomicanje; Senzor; S klizačem; Nagib; Dodir; Ostalo
vi: Loại điều khiển chuyển mạch: Nút; Đòn bẩy; Xoay; Thanh cuộn; Cảm biến; Thanh trượt; Lướt dọc; Chạm; Khác
ja: スイッチ制御の種類: ボタン; レバー; ロータリー; スクロールバー; センサー; スライダー; チルト; タッチ; その他
sl-SI: Tip krmiljenja stikala: Gumb; Vzvod; Krožna; Pomikalna vrstica; Senzor; Drsnik; Nagib; Dotik; Drugo
da: Kontaktkontroltype: Knap; Håndtag; Roterende; Rullebar; Sensor; Skyder; Tilt; Berøring; Andet
zh-TW: 開關控制類型: 按鈕; 槓桿; 旋轉; 捲軸; 感應器; 滑桿; 傾斜; 觸碰; 其他
ro-RO: Tip control comutator: Buton; Manetă; Rotativ; Bară de defilare; Senzor; Glisor; Înclinare; Tactil; Altele
ru: Тип управления переключателем: Кнопка; Рычаг; Вращение; Полоса прокрутки; Датчик; Слайдер; Наклон; Сенсорный; Другое
es: Tipo de control del interruptor: Botón; Palanca; Giratoria; Barra de desplazamiento; Sensor; Deslizador; Inclinable; Táctil; Otros
ko: 스위치 제어 유형: 버튼; 레버; 회전; 스크롤 바; 센서; 슬라이더; 기울임; 터치; 기타
th: ประเภทตัวควบคุมสวิตช์: ปุ่ม; คันโยก; โรตารี; แถบเลื่อน; เซนเซอร์; แถบสไลด์; เอียง; สัมผัส; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ ovládání přepínače: Tlačítko; Páčka; Rotační; Posuvník; Senzor; Jezdec; Nakloněná; Dotykový; Jiné
nl: Bedieningstype schakelaar: Knop; Hendel; Roterend; Schuifbalk; Sensor; Schuifregelaar; Kantelbaar; Aanraken; Andere
it: Tipo di controllo dell’interruttore: Pulsante; Leva; A rotazione; Barra di scorrimento; Sensore; Dispositivo di scorrimento; Ad angolo; Touch; Altro
nb: Bryterkontrolltype: Knapp; Spak; Roterende; Rullefelt; Sensor; Skyvebryter; Tilt; Berøring; Annet
fi: Kytkimen ohjaustapa: Painike; Vipu; Pyörivä; Vierityspalkki; Sensori; Liukusäädin; Kallistettu; Kosketus; Muu
lt-LT: Jungiklio valdymo tipas: Mygtukas; Svirtis; Rotacinis; Slinkties juosta; Jutiklis; Slankiklis; Jungiklis; Jutiklinis; Kita
sv: Omkopplartyp: Knappen uppåt; Spak; Roterande; Rullningslist; Sensor; Skjutreglage; Lutning; Touch; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип управление на превключване: Бутон; Лост; Ротационен; Лента за превъртане; Сензор; Плъзгач; Накланяне; Сензорен; Други
pl: Typ sterowania przełącznikiem: Przycisk; Dźwignia; Rotacyjny; Pasek przewijania; Czujnik; Suwak; Nachylenie; Dotyk; Inne